Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 11.5
ALTERNATIVE FORMS OF PAYMENT
TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS

Section

29-11.5-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Alternative forms of payment" means forms of payment, including but not limited to credit, charge, or debit cards, other than cash or check.

"Collector local governmental entity" means any state or local governmental entity that collects moneys payable to a local governmental entity that the state or local governmental entity must remit to one or more other state or local governmental entities.

"Local governmental entity" means any county, municipality, city and county, school district, special district, or other political subdivision of the state; any department, agency, institution, or authority of such a county, municipality, city and county, school district, special district, or other political subdivision; or an authorized agent of any of the foregoing.

"Moneys payable to a local governmental entity" means moneys owed or paid to any local governmental entity other than bail bonds, judicial bonds, or other moneys that the local governmental entity must return to the payer upon the satisfaction of one or more specified conditions by the payer.

"Provider of alternative forms of payment" means a person or entity, including but not limited to an issuer of credit, charge, or debit cards, that provides its customers the ability to use one or more alternative forms of payment.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire article added, p. 429, § 2, effective August 4.

29-11.5-102. Acceptance of alternative forms of payment for the payment of moneys payable to local governments - allocation of costs.

Any local governmental entity responsible for the collection of moneys payable to a local governmental entity may accept one or more alternative forms of payment for the payment of such moneys in accordance with the provisions of this article.

A collector local governmental entity that chooses to accept one or more alternative forms of payment for the payment of moneys payable to a local governmental entity that the collector local governmental entity must remit to one or more other governmental entities shall either:

Remit to such other governmental entities the gross amount of any payments made by alternative forms of payment that the collector local governmental entity is required to remit to such other governmental entities notwithstanding the deduction of any moneys from such gross amount by any provider of alternative forms of payment pursuant to a master agreement or other agreement authorized by this article; or

Enter into an intergovernmental agreement with each such other governmental entity regarding the allocation of the costs of accepting such alternative forms of payment.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire article added, p. 429, § 2, effective August 4.

29-11.5-103. Limitations on convenience fees for the use of alternative forms of payment.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 1442, § 2, effective April 29, 2003.)

A local governmental entity may impose a convenience fee on persons who use alternative forms of payment, but the amount of any convenience fee imposed on or after April 29, 2003, shall not exceed the actual additional cost incurred by the local governmental agency to process the transaction by alternative form of payment. Any convenience fee on a transaction involving an alternative form of payment shall be imposed in accordance with the rules of the alternative payment provider.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire article added, p. 429, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1442, § 2, effective April 29.

29-11.5-104. Legislative declaration - master agreements.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that it is in the best interests of all Coloradans that local governmental entities that choose to accept alternative forms of payment do so in the most consumer-oriented, cost-effective, and uniform manner possible. Accordingly, it is the intent of the general assembly to encourage local governmental entities to join with other local governmental entities in contractual arrangements with providers of alternative forms of payment or to join one or more master agreements entered into by the state treasurer pursuant to section 24-19.5-104, C.R.S.

Any local governmental entity that accepts one or more alternative forms of payment for payments payable to a local governmental entity may:

Join with one or more other local governmental entities in negotiating and entering into one or more contracts with one or more providers of alternative forms of payment; or

Join in any master agreement entered into by the state treasurer pursuant to section 24-19.5-104, C.R.S., with the approval of the state treasurer or pursuant to any rules promulgated by the state treasurer.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire article added, p. 430, § 2, effective August 4.